Hawaii statutes.
[§159-30] Storing, handling and
transporting. The board may prescribe conditions under which carcasses,
parts of carcasses, meat or meat products of cattle, sheep, swine, goats,
horses, mules, or other equines, capable of use as human food, shall be stored
or otherwise handled by any person engaged in the business of buying, selling,
freezing, storing or transporting, in or for intrastate commerce, such meat or
meat products, whenever the board deems action necessary to assure that such
meat or meat products will not be adulterated or misbranded when delivered to
the consumer. The violation of any regulation is prohibited. [L 1969, c 214,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next